Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF301.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1693HV (1) 91 je/jh H.F. 301 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 263.6 Residency and fellowship 1 positions ââ priority for certain candidates ââ rural rotations. 2 The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics shall give 3 priority in awarding federal residency positions as established 4 under the federal Balanced Budget Act of 1997, Pub. L. No. 5 105-33, and fellowships to applicants who are residents of 6 Iowa, attended and earned an undergraduate degree from an 7 Iowa college or university, or attended and earned a medical 8 degree from a medical school in Iowa. The university of Iowa 9 hospitals and clinics shall also provide the opportunity to 10 participate in a rural rotation to persons to whom a primary 11 care residency or fellowship position, including such positions 12 in psychiatry, is awarded in order to expose the resident or 13 fellow to rural areas of the state. 14